Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1216
Well seal, defined.

Well seal shall mean an arrangement or device used to cap a water well or to establish and maintain a junction between the casing or curbing of a water well and the piping or equipment installed therein, the purpose or function of which is to prevent pollutants from entering the water well.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 16.